Utah statutes.
73-2-23.1.   Assistance of state engineer in management of flood waters.

In addition to his other flood management authority under Sections 73-2-22 and 73-2-23, the state engineer may assist in the management of flood waters pursuant to court judgments and decrees.



Enacted by Chapter 228, 1985 General Session

